Missouri, session 2026, HB2908.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 409.4-410, 409.6-601, and 409.6-604, RSMo, are repealed and
three new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 409.4-410, 409.6-601, and
409.6-604, to read as follows:
409.4-410. (a) A person shall pay a fee of two hundred dollars when initially filing
an application for registration as a broker-dealer and a fee of one hundred dollars when filing
a renewal of registration as a broker-dealer. If the filing results in a denial or withdrawal, the
commissioner shall retain the entire fee.
(b) The fee for an individual is fifty dollars when filing an application for registration
as an agent, a fee of fifty dollars when filing a renewal of registration as an agent, and a fee of
fifty dollars when filing for a change of registration as an agent. If the filing results in a
denial or withdrawal, the commissioner shall retain the entire fee.
(c) A person shall pay a fee of two hundred dollars when filing an application for
registration as an investment adviser and a fee of one hundred dollars when filing a renewal of
registration as an investment adviser. If the filing results in a denial or withdrawal, the
commissioner shall retain the entire fee.
(d) The fee for an individual is fifty dollars when filing an application for registration
as an investment adviser representative, a fee of fifty dollars when filing a renewal of
registration as an investment adviser representative, and a fee of fifty dollars when filing a
change of registration as an investment adviser representative. If the filing results in a denial
or withdrawal, the commissioner shall retain the entire fee.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HBs 2908 & 2990 2
(e) A federal covered investment adviser required to file a notice under section 409.4-
405 shall pay an initial fee of two hundred dollars and an annual notice fee of one hundred
dollars.
(f) A person required to pay a filing or notice fee under this section may transmit the
fee through or to a designee as a rule or order provides under this act.
(g) An investment adviser representative who is registered as an agent under section
409.4-402 and who represents a person that is both registered as a broker-dealer under section
409.4-401 and registered as an investment adviser under section 409.4-403 or required as a
federal covered investment adviser to make a notice filing under section 409.4-405 is not
required to pay an initial or annual registration fee for registration as an investment adviser
representative.
(h) (1) The commissioner may, by rule, adjust the fees in this section to generate
the moneys necessary to cover the expenses or costs associated with administering this
chapter.
(2) For an adjustment to the fees by rule occurring after June 30, 2030, such
adjustment shall be subject to the following:
(A) The commissioner shall file a final order of rulemaking for such rule with
the joint committee on administrative rules under chapter 536 after October thirty-first
but before December first of the calendar year before the calendar year in which the
rule takes effect;
(B) If the general assembly deems such rule to be beyond the scope and authority
provided in this subsection, the general assembly may reject the fee adjustment by
adopting a concurrent resolution pursuant to Article IV, Section 8 disapproving such
rule before the fifteenth day of March of the calendar year immediately following the
filing of the final order of rulemaking for such rule; and
(C) If the general assembly:
(i) Adopts a concurrent resolution disapproving such rule, the rule shall not take
effect, the commissioner shall not implement the fee adjustment, and the commissioner
shall continue to use fees established in this section or in the most recent preceding rule
promulgated under this subdivision; or
(ii) Does not adopt a concurrent resolution disapproving the rule, the rule shall
take effect after the publication of such rule as provided in chapter 536.
(3) (A) A fee increase shall not be made more than one time in any four-year
time period and in no case shall the total of all fee increases exceed the amount of
twenty-five dollars in an eight-year time period.
(B) No fee increase shall be made under this subsection after December 31, 2045.

HCS HBs 2908 & 2990 3
(4) In determining whether a fee increase is necessary, the commissioner shall
consider the following factors:
(A) The cost of administering and enforcing this chapter, including personnel,
equipment, and operational expenses;
(B) Inflation and changes in the cost of living, as measured by the Consumer
Price Index or other appropriate indices;
(C) The adequacy of current fee levels to cover regulatory and oversight
functions;
(D) The growth or decline in the number of registrations;
(E) Any legislative, legal, or technological changes or emerging risks that
increase regulatory responsibilities or service levels;
(F) The need to maintain appropriate staffing levels and technical capacity;
(G) Revenue generated from other sources; and
(H) Public interest considerations including, but not limited to, the potential
impact of a fee increase on individuals subject to the fees in this section.
(i) (1) The commissioner shall conduct a comprehensive financial review of the
division's revenue and expenditures every four years, beginning in fiscal year 2030. The
review shall include an analysis of all sources of funding and expenditures over the
preceding four fiscal years, a summary of trends in revenues and expenditures of the
preceding four fiscal years, and an identification of any budget surplus or deficit for
each year under review. The findings of the review shall be published in a report and
posted to the division's website within ninety days of completion.
(2) If the commissioner, in conducting the review, determines a budget surplus
exists that is not reasonably necessary to meet the anticipated costs of operating the
division, the commissioner shall, by order, decrease the fees in an amount that ensures
that fee revenue more closely aligns with the operational needs of the division.
(3) Except as otherwise limited in subdivision (4) of this subsection, in addition
to a required decrease of fees after a comprehensive financial review, the commissioner
may decrease the fees by any amount at any time.
(4) In no event shall fees be decreased by an amount that would result in the fee
being less than the amount established by the general assembly under subsections (a) to
(e) of this section.
409.6-601. (a) This act shall be administered by the commissioner of securities who
shall be appointed by and act under the direction of the secretary of state, and shall receive
compensation as provided by law.
(b) The attorney general shall appear on behalf of and represent the commissioner in
all proceedings before the administrative hearing commission, and in the circuit court of any

HCS HBs 2908 & 2990 4
county of the state or any city not within a county, or any court of another state in all civil
enforcement actions brought under this act. The attorney general may appoint attorneys
employed by the secretary of state as special assistant attorneys general to appear on behalf of
and represent the commissioner.
(c) It is unlawful for the secretary of state, commissioner or an officer, employee, or
designee of the commissioner to use for personal benefit or the benefit of others records or
other information obtained by or filed with the commissioner that are not public under section
409.6-607(b). This act does not authorize the secretary of state, commissioner or an officer,
employee, or designee of the commissioner to disclose the record or information, except in
accordance with section 409.6-602, 409.6-607(c), or 409.6-608.
(d) This act does not create or diminish a privilege or exemption that exists at
common law, by statute or rule, or otherwise.
(e) The commissioner may develop and implement investor education initiatives to
inform the public about investing in securities, with particular emphasis on the prevention and
detection of securities fraud. In developing and implementing these initiatives, the
commissioner may collaborate with public and nonprofit organizations with an interest in
investor education. The commissioner may accept a grant or donation from a person that is
not affiliated with the securities industry or from a nonprofit organization, regardless of
whether the organization is affiliated with the securities industry, to develop and implement
investor education initiatives. This subsection does not authorize the commissioner to require
participation or monetary contributions of a registrant in an investor education program.
(f) The "Investor Education and Protection Fund" is created to provide funds for the
purposes identified in subsection (e). Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080, any
funds remaining in the secretary of state's investor education and protection fund at the end of
any biennium shall not be transferred to the general revenue fund.
(g) (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Securities Division
Fund", which shall consist of the following:
(A) One hundred percent of moneys collected that are attributable to a fee
adjustment implemented by rule under section 409.4-410(h) or (i);
(B) Moneys collected that are attributable to a reasonable charge assessed by the
commissioner for conducting an audit or inspection under section 409.4-411(d);
(C) (i) Before January 1, 2046, fifty percent of moneys collected that are
attributable to the payment of fees required under section 409.4-410(b) and (d) when, on
or after the effective date of this section, a person initially files an application for
registration and when such person files:
i. A renewal of registration; or
ii. A change of registration; and

HCS HBs 2908 & 2990 5
(ii) Beginning on January 1, 2046, fifty percent of moneys collected that are
attributable to the payment of all fees required under section 409.4-410(b) and (d); and
(D) Other moneys that are appropriated by the general assembly for the purpose
of administering and enforcing the provisions of this chapter.
(2) The fund shall be a dedicated fund and moneys deposited in the state
treasury to the credit of the securities division fund shall be used solely as follows:
(A) By the securities division for reimbursement of the reasonable costs of
conducting an audit or inspection under 409.4-411(d);
(B) By the securities division for the reasonable costs of operating the division;
(C) By the commissioner of the securities division for the purposes identified in
section 409.4-410(h); and
(D) For transfers to the investor education and protection fund created in this
section.
(3) The state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. In accordance with
sections 30.170 and 30.180, the state treasurer may approve disbursements.
(4) If the balance of the securities division fund exceeds two hundred fifty
thousand dollars at the end of a given calendar year, the amount in excess of two
hundred fifty dollars shall be transferred to the investor education and protection fund
created in this section.
(5) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner as
other funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
credited to the fund.
(6) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys
remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
general revenue fund.
409.6-604. (a) If the commissioner determines that a person has engaged, is
engaging, or is about to engage in an act, practice, or course of business constituting a
violation of this act or a rule adopted or order issued under this act or that a person has
materially aided, is materially aiding, or is about to materially aid an act, practice, or course of
business constituting a violation of this act or a rule adopted or order issued under this act, the
commissioner may:
(1) Issue an order directing the person to cease and desist from engaging in the act,
practice, or course of business or to take other action necessary or appropriate to comply with
this act;
(2) Issue an order denying, suspending, revoking, or conditioning the exemptions for
a broker-dealer under section 409.4-401(b)(1)(D) or (F) or an investment adviser under
section 409.4-403(b)(1)(C); or

HCS HBs 2908 & 2990 6
(3) Issue an order under section 409.2-204.
(b) An order under subsection (a) is effective on the date of issuance. Upon issuance
of the order, the commissioner shall promptly serve each person subject to the order with a
copy of the order and a notice that the order has been entered. The order must include a
statement whether the commissioner will seek a civil penalty or costs of the investigation, a
statement of the reasons for the order, and notice that, within fifteen days after receipt of a
request in a record from the person, the matter will be scheduled for a hearing. If a person
subject to the order does not request a hearing and none is ordered by the commissioner
within thirty days after the date of service of the order, the order becomes final as to that
person by operation of law. If a hearing is requested or ordered, the commissioner, after
notice of and opportunity for hearing to each person subject to the order, may modify or
vacate the order or extend it until final determination.
(c) If a hearing is requested or ordered pursuant to subsection (b), a hearing before the
commissioner must be provided. A final order may not be issued unless the commissioner
makes findings of fact and conclusions of law in a record in accordance with the provisions of
chapter 536 and procedural rules promulgated by the commissioner. The final order may
make final, vacate, or modify the order issued under subsection (a).
(d) In a final order under subsection (c), the commissioner may:
(1) Impose a civil penalty up to twenty-five thousand dollars for each violation;
(2) Order a person subject to the order to pay restitution for any loss, including the
amount of any actual damages that may have been caused by the conduct and interest at the
rate of eight percent per year from the date of the violation causing the loss or disgorge any
profits arising from the violation;
(3) In addition to any civil penalty otherwise provided by law, impose an additional
civil penalty not to exceed fifteen thousand dollars for each such violation if the
commissioner finds that a person subject to the order has violated any provision of this act
and that such violation was committed against an elderly or disabled person. For purposes of
this section, the following terms mean:
(A) "Disabled person", a person with a physical or mental impairment that
substantially limits one or more of the major life activities of such individual, a record of such
impairment, or being regarded as having such an impairment;
(B) "Elderly person", a person sixty years of age or older.
(e) In a final order, the commissioner may charge the actual cost of an investigation or
proceeding for a violation of this act or a rule adopted or order issued under this act. These
funds may be paid into the [investor education and protection] restitution recovery fund
created in this section.

HCS HBs 2908 & 2990 7
(f) If a petition for judicial review of a final order is not filed in accordance with
section 409.6-609, the commissioner may file a certified copy of the final order with the clerk
of a court of competent jurisdiction. The order so filed has the same effect as a judgment of
the court and may be recorded, enforced, or satisfied in the same manner as a judgment of the
court.
(g) If a person does not comply with an order under this section, the commissioner
may petition a court of competent jurisdiction to enforce the order. The court may not require
the commissioner to post a bond in an action or proceeding under this section. If the court
finds, after service and opportunity for hearing, that the person was not in compliance with
the order, the court may adjudge the person in civil contempt of the order. The court may
impose a further civil penalty against the person for contempt in an amount not less than five
thousand dollars but not greater than one hundred thousand dollars for each violation and may
grant any other relief the court determines is just and proper in the circumstances.
(h) The commissioner is authorized to issue administrative consent orders in the
settlement of any proceeding in the public interest under this act.
(i) (1) Moneys collected from an order entered under this section shall be
deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the restitution recovery fund created in
this subsection.
(2) (A) There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Restitution Recovery
Fund", which shall consist of the following:
(i) Moneys collected from an order entered under this section; and
(ii) Other moneys that are appropriated by the general assembly for the purpose
of administering and enforcing the provisions of this chapter.
(B) The fund shall be a dedicated fund and shall be administered by the
commissioner of the securities division for the sole purposes of awarding:
(i) Restitution ordered under this section; and
(ii) Restitution assistance to aggrieved investors who were awarded restitution in
a final order issued under sections 409.1-101 to 409.7-703 but who did not receive
payment in full of the amount awarded.
(C) The state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. In accordance with
sections 30.170 and 30.180, the state treasurer may approve disbursements.
(D) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys
remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
general revenue fund.
(E) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner as
other funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
credited to the fund.

HCS HBs 2908 & 2990 8
(3) The commissioner of the securities division shall promulgate rules to
administer the restitution recovery fund and to establish the conditions upon which
restitution assistance shall be awarded from the fund to an aggrieved investor described
in subparagraph (ii) of paragraph (B) of subdivision (2) of this subsection. Rules
establishing the conditions for such award of restitution assistance to an aggrieved
investor shall include at least the following:
(A) The qualifications that establish an aggrieved investor’s eligibility for
restitution from the fund;
(B) A method for determining the number of aggrieved investors who are
eligible for restitution from the fund;
(C) A method for calculating the total amount each eligible aggrieved investor is
eligible to receive;
(D) A method for listing the name and mailing address of each eligible aggrieved
investor;
100 (E) A calculation for determining whether the amount remaining in the
101 restitution recovery fund after the award of all eligible restitution will be below fifty
102 thousand dollars; and
103 (F) A method for prorating awards to eligible aggrieved investors to ensure that
104 the balance of the restitution recovery fund is not below fifty thousand dollars after all
105 eligible restitution is awarded to aggrieved investors.
106 (4) (A) After determining that the conditions for awarding restitution from the
107 restitution recovery fund to aggrieved investors described in subparagraph (ii) of
108 paragraph (B) of subdivision (2) of this subsection have been met as described in
109 subdivision (3) of this subsection, the commissioner shall notify the state treasurer of
110 such determination. Such notice shall contain the information described in subdivision
111 (3) of this subsection and any other necessary information required by rules
112 promulgated by the commissioner.
113 (B) Upon receiving such notification from the commissioner, the state treasurer
114 shall approve the disbursal of such determined amount from the restitution recovery
115 fund to each aggrieved investor identified in the notice.
116 (5) Restitution assistance awarded under subparagraph (ii) of paragraph (B) of
117 subdivision (2) of this subsection may be awarded in an amount that is the lesser of:
118 (A) Twenty-five thousand dollars; or
119 (B) Twenty-five percent of unpaid restitution awarded in a final order described
120 in subparagraph (ii) of paragraph (B) of subdivision (2) of this subsection.
121 (6) If payment of restitution assistance to aggrieved investors would result in a
122 restitution recovery fund balance below fifty thousand dollars, the commissioner may

HCS HBs 2908 & 2990 9
123 suspend restitution assistance until such time as the commissioner determines a
124 sufficient balance has been restored to the fund.
125 (7) If the balance of the restitution recovery fund exceeds one million dollars at
126 the end of a given calendar year, the amount in excess of one million dollars shall be
127 transferred to the investor education and protection fund created in section 409.6-601.
✔